Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 2 Administration of Mental Disability Services

Editor’s notes.

The previous provisions of this article relating to the State Commission on Mental Health, Mental Retardation, and Substance Abuse Service Delivery formerly consisted of Code Sections

37-2-30

through

37-2-34

and was based on Code 1981, §§

37-2-30

through

37-2-34

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1357, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 17; Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, § 8, and was repealed by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18, effective December 1, 1994.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 133, §§ 1, 2/HB 535, effective July 1, 2008, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the current article. The former article consisted of Code Sections

37-2-30

through

37-2-44

, relating to administration of mental disability services, and was based on Code 1981, §§

37-2-30

through

37-2-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 440, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-8.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 133, § 4/HB 535, provided that Parts 1 and 2 of Article 2 of this chapter became effective only if funds were specifically appropriated for purposes of each part in an Appropriations Act making specific reference to that part and became
effective when funds so appropriated became available for expenditure. Funds were not appropriated at the 2008 or 2009 sessions of the General Assembly. However, Ga. L. 2010, p. 286, § 24/SB 244, effective July 1, 2010, repealed Ga. L.
2008, p. 133, § 4/HB 535.